Hawaii statutes.
§266-52 Powers. In addition and
supplemental to the powers granted to the department by law, the department
may:

(1) With the approval of the governor, enter into a
special facility lease or an amendment or supplement thereto whereby the
department agrees with another person engaged in maritime and maritime-related
operations to construct, acquire, remodel, furnish, or equip a special facility
solely for the use by such other person to a special facility lease; provided
that such special facility lease may be amendatory and supplemental to an
existing lease between the department and such other person for the land upon
which the special facility which is the subject of such special facility lease
is to be situated;

(2) With the approval of the governor:

(A) Issue special facility revenue bonds in
such principal amounts as may be necessary to yield the amount of the cost of
any construction, acquisition, remodeling, furnishing, and equipping of any
special facility; provided that the total principal amount of the special
facility revenue bonds which may be issued pursuant to the authorization of
this subparagraph shall not exceed $100,000,000; and

(B) Issue special facility revenue refunding
bonds, without further authorization by the legislature, to refund outstanding
special facility revenue bonds, including special facility revenue refunding
bonds, or any part thereof, at or before the maturity or redemption date,
issued pursuant to this part; provided that any issuance of the refunding bonds
shall not reduce the amount authorized by the legislature as provided in
paragraph (2)(A);

(3) Perform and carry out the terms and provisions of
any special facility lease;

(4) Notwithstanding section 103-7 or any other law to
the contrary, acquire, construct, remodel, furnish, or equip any special
facility, or accept the assignment of any contract therefor entered into by the
other person to the special facility lease;

(5) Construct any special facility on land owned by
the State; and

(6) Agree with the other person to the special
facility lease whereby any acquisition, construction, remodeling, furnishing,
or equipping of the special facility and the expenditure of moneys therefor
shall be undertaken or supervised by such other person. [L 1980, c 126, pt of §2;
am L 1984, c 203, §2; am L 1993, c 2, §1 as superseded by c 212, §1; am L Sp
1993, c 8, §55; am L 2004, c 216, §33]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next